Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-417
Class I school district; merger with certain Class I school districts; petition.

When the legal voters of a Class I school district petition to merge with a Class I district with a six-member school board, such merger may be accepted by petition of the school board of the accepting district.

Laws 1971, LB 468, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-402.05;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 166;

Laws 2005, LB 126, § 57;

Referendum 2006, No. 422.